Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB803.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Maintenance and Use of Opioid Antagonists.--(a) Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this section, the department, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall develop a policy requiring a school entity offering grade nine, ten, eleven or twelve to maintain and provide onsite opioid antagonists in each school facility.(b) The policy developed under subsection (a):123456789101112131415161718 (1) Shall include procedures to follow when dealing with a suspected opioid overdose event.(2) May not require an individual to administer an opioid antagonist.(3) Shall provide the quantities and types of opioid antagonists to be maintained by the school entity.(c) A trained school nurse, teacher or other individual in a school entity who is considered qualified by the department may administer an opioid antagonist during an emergency to a student or staff member at a school facility having a suspected opioid overdose event whether or not there is a previous history of drug abuse.(d) A school nurse, teacher or other individual may receive training in the administration of opioid antagonists provided by the Department of Health.(e) A school entity shall maintain opioid antagonists at each school facility in a safe and secure location.(f) When an opioid antagonist is administered under this section to a student or staff member at a school facility, the school nurse, teacher or other individual considered qualified by the department shall ensure that the student or staff member is transported to the nearest hospital emergency department for medical care.(g) A school nurse, teacher or individual who has completed training as required by the department under this section and who, acting in good faith and with reasonable care, administers an opioid antagonist to a student or staff member who is having a suspected opioid overdose event:(1) Shall be immune from criminal prosecution, sanction under professional licensing statute and civil liability for 20250HB0803PN0831 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administering the opioid antagonist.(2) May not be subject to professional review for administering the opioid antagonist.(3) May not be liable for civil damages for acts or omissions resulting from administration of the opioid antagonist.(h) The receipt of the required training and the prompt seeking of additional medical assistance by an individual authorized under this section to do so creates a rebuttable presumption that the individual acted with reasonable care in administering the opioid antagonist.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Opioid antagonist" means a drug that binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effects of opioids acting on the receptors. The term includes naloxone hydrochloride, also known as Narcan or naloxone."School entity" means a public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth."Suspected opioid overdose event" means an acute medical condition, including severe physical illness, coma, mania, hysteria or death:(1) resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid causing an adverse reaction; and(2) that a prudent person, possessing an average knowledge 20250HB0803PN0831 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of medicine and health, would reasonably believe is in fact an overdose of a drug requiring immediate medical attention.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0803PN0831 - 4 - 123